test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-6-wingkwe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# (20230506: Csilla)

  Verb - виӈкве: # Verb 'to take, to bring' - full paradigm
    виӈкве+V+Inf: виӈкве
#Active, present tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: выгум
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: выгын
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: выг
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: выгме̄н
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [выгын, выгы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: выгыг
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: [выгув, выгӯв]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [выгын, выгы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: выгыт

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, single object
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg3: выглум
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg3: выглын
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3: выгтэ
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcSg3: выглуме̄н
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg3: [выглын, выглы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcSg3: выгтэ̄н
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg3: [выглув, выглӯв]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg3: [выглын, выглы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3: выганыл

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, dual object
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcDu3: выгагум
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcDu3: выгагын
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcDu3: выгаге
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcDu3: выгагме̄н
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcDu3: [выгагын, выгагы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcDu3: выгаге̄н
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcDu3: [выгагув, выгагӯв]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcDu3: [выгагын, выгагы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcDu3: выгаганыл

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, plural object
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl3: выганум
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl3: [выганын, выган]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3: выганэ
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcPl3: выганаме̄н
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcPl3: [выганын, выганы̄н, выган]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcPl3: выганэ̄н
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl3: [выганув, выганӯв]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl3: [выганын, выганы̄н, выган]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3: выганыл

#Active, past tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: висум
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: висын
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: вис
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: висме̄н
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [висын, висы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: [висыг, висы̄г]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [висув, висӯв]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [висын, висы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: висыт

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, single object
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg3: вислум
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg3: вислын
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg3: вистэ
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcSg3: вислуме̄н
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcSg3: [вислын, вислы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcSg3: вистэ̄н
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg3: [вислув, вислӯв]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg3: [вислын, вислы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg3: висаныл

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, dual object
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcDu3: висагум
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcDu3: висагын
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcDu3: висаге
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcDu3: висагме̄н
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcDu3: [висагын, висагы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcDu3: висаге̄н
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcDu3: [висагув, висагӯв]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcDu3: [висагын, висагы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcDu3: висаганыл

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, plural object
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl3: висанум
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl3: [виса̄нын, висан]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl3: висанэ
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcPl3: [висанаме̄н, висанаме̄н, висанме̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcPl3: [висанын, висаны̄н, висан]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcPl3: висанэ̄н
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl3: висанув
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl3: [висанын, висаны̄н, висан]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl3: висаныл

#Active, conditional, subjective conjugation
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1: [винувум, винӯвум]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2: [винувын, винӯвын]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3: винув
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1: винуваме̄н
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2: [винувын, винувы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3: [винувыг, винувы̄г]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1: [винувув, винувӯв]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2: [винувын, винувы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3: [винувыт, винувы̄т]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, single object
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg3: винувлум
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg3: винувлын
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg3: винувтэ
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcSg3: винувламе̄н
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcSg3: [винувлын, винувлы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcSg3: винувтэ̄н
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg3: [винувлув, винувлӯв]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg3: [винувлын, винувлы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg3: [винуваныл, винува̄ныл]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, dual object
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcDu3: [винувагум, винува̄гум]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcDu3: [винувагын, винува̄гын]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcDu3: [винуваге, винува̄ге]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcDu3: винувагме̄н
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcDu3: [винувагын, винувагы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcDu3: винуваге̄н
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcDu3: [винувагув, винувагӯв]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcDu3: [винувагын, винувагы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcDu3: [винуваганыл, винувага̄ныл]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, plural object
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl3: [винуванум, винува̄нум]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl3: [винуванын, винува̄нын]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl3: [винуванэ, винува̄нэ]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcPl3: винуванме̄н
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcPl3: [винуванын, винуваны̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcPl3: винуванэ̄н
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl3: винуванув
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl3: [винуванын, винуваны̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl3: [винуваныл, винува̄ныл]

#Active, imperative, subjective conjugation
    виӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2: воен
    виӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2: [воен, вое̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2: [воен, вое̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, single object
    виӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: [воелн, вое̄лн]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcSg3: [вое̄лн, вое̄лы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: [вое̄лн, вое̄лы̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, dual object
    виӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcDu3: [воегын, вое̄гн]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcDu3: [воегын, воегы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcDu3: [воегын, воегы̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, plural object
    виӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl3: [воен, вое̄н, вое̄нын]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl3: [воен, вое̄н, вое̄нын, вое̄ны̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl3: [воен, вое̄н, вое̄нын, вое̄ны̄н]

#Passive, present tense, indicative
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: вивем
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: вивен
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: виве
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: вивеме̄н
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [вивен, виве̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: виве̄г
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: виве̄в
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [вивен, виве̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: вивет

#Passive, past tense, indicative
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: войве̄сум
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: войве̄сын
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [войвес, войве̄с]
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: войвесаме̄н
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [войвесын, войвесы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: войвесы̄г
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [войвесув, войвесӯв]
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [войвесын, войвесы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: войве̄сыт

#Passive, conditional
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg1: [винувем, винӯвем]
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg2: [винувен, винӯвен]
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg3: [винуве, винӯве]
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu1: винувеме̄н
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu2: [винувен, винуве̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu3: [винувег, винуве̄г]
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl1: винуве̄в
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl2: [винувен, винуве̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl3: [винувет, винӯвет]

#Passive, imperative conjugation
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+ScSg2: выгвен
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+ScDu2: [выгвен, выгве̄н]
    виӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+ScPl2: [выгвен, выгве̄н]

#Present participle
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc: винэ
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: винэм
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: винэн
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: винэ̄тэ
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: винэме̄н
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: винэнэ̄н
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: [винэг, винэ̄г]
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: винэ̄в
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: [винэн, винэ̄н]
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: [винэныл, винэ̄ныл]

#Present participle, single object
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: винэ̄лум
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: [винэ̄лн, винэ̄лын]
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: винэ̄тэ
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: винэламе̄н
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: винэлы̄н
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: винэтэ̄н
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: [винэлув, винэлӯв]
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: винэлы̄н
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: [винӭнл, винэ̄ныл]

#Present participle, dual object
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: винэ̄гум
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: [винэ̄гн, винэ̄гын]
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: винэ̄гэ
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: винэгаме̄н
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: винэгы̄н
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: винэгэ̄н
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: [винэгув, винэгӯв]
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: винэгагы̄н
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: винэгаганыл

#Present participle, plural object
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: винэ̄нум
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: винэ̄н
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: винэ̄нэ
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: [винэнаме̄н, винэнанме̄н]
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: [винэны̄н, винэныны̄н, винэнаны̄н] 
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: [винэнэ̄н, винэнанэ̄н]
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: [винэнув, винэнӯв, винэнанув, винэнанӯв]
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: [винэны̄н, винэнаны̄н]
    виӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: [винэ̄нл, винэ̄наныл]

#Past participle
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc: вим
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: вимум
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: вимын
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: виме
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: вимаме̄н
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: [вимын, вимы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: вимыг
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [вимув, вимӯв]
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: [вимын, виммы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: вимыт

#Past participle, single object
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: вимлум
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: вимлын
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: вимтэ
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: вимламе̄н
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: вимлы̄н
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: вимтэ̄н
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [вимлув, вимлӯв]
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: вимлы̄н
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: виманыл

#Past participle, dual object
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: вимагум
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: вимагын
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: вимаге
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: [вимагаме̄н, вимагагме̄н]
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: [вимагы̄н, вимагагы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: [вимагы̄г, вимагагы̄г]
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [вимагув, вимагӯв]
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: [вимагы̄н, вимагагы̄н]
    виӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: [вимагагыл, вимагаганыл]
